Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.085

Types of advertising prohibited.

(1) Physical therapists shall not advertise that they perform spinal manipulation, manipulative mobilization of the spine, chiropractic adjustment, spinal adjustment, maintenance or wellness manipulation, or chiropractic care of any kind.

(2) A violation of this section is unprofessional conduct under this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW.

[ 2014 c 116 s 5; 1988 c 185 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2014 c 116: See note following RCW 18.74.190.